Washington statutes.
RCW 15.86.110

Confidentiality of business related information.

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the department shall keep confidential any business related information obtained under this chapter concerning an entity certified under this chapter or an applicant for such certification and such information shall be exempt from public inspection and copying under chapter 42.56 RCW.

(2) Applications for certification under this chapter and laboratory analyses pertaining to that certification shall be available for public inspection and copying.

[ 2005 c 274 s 218; 1992 c 71 s 11.]